Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-358
Control program; county board; powers; requirements.

For the purpose of carrying on an organized animal damage control program within their respective counties, the county boards may cooperate with the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service of the United States Department of Agriculture, state agencies, private associations, and individuals in the control of coyotes, bobcats, foxes, badgers, opossums, raccoons, skunks, and other predatory animals in this state that are injurious to livestock, poultry, and game animals and the public health. The county boards may also undertake the control of commensal and field rodents, nuisance birds, and other nuisance wildlife if such rodents, birds, or wildlife are causing or are about to cause property damage or represent a human health threat. All control efforts shall be in accordance with the organized and systematic plans of the United States Department of Agriculture and state agencies covering the management and control of animals, birds, and wildlife.

Laws 1945, c. 53, § 1, p. 237;

Laws 1959, c. 148, § 1, p. 563;

Laws 1987, LB 102, § 1.